src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-35tarw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tarõ: # Noun (35) tarõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    tarõ+N+Sg+Nom: tarõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Gen: tarõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Par: tarrõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ill: tarrõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ine: tarõn
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ela: tarõst
    tarõ+N+Sg+All: tarõlõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ade: tarõl
    tarõ+N+Sg+Abl: tarõlt
    tarõ+N+Sg+Tra: tarõs
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ter: tarõniq
    tarõ+N+Sg+Abe: tarõldaq
    tarõ+N+Sg+Com: tarõgaq
    tarõ+N+Pl+Nom: tarõq
    tarõ+N+Pl+Gen: tarri
    tarõ+N+Pl+Par: tarri
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ill: tarrihe
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ine: tarin
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ela: tarist
    tarõ+N+Pl+All: tarilõ
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ade: taril
    tarõ+N+Pl+Abl: tarilt
    tarõ+N+Pl+Tra: taris
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ter: tariniq
    tarõ+N+Pl+Abe: tarildaq
    tarõ+N+Pl+Com: tarrigaq
